Utah statutes.
31A-22-1706.   Notice of cancellation, nonrenewal, or material change.

(1)  A certificate holder only has a right to a notice of cancellation, nonrenewal, a material change, or to a similar notice if the certificate holder has rights to the notice under the terms of the insurance policy to which the certificate of insurance refers, or under any rider, or endorsement to the insurance policy.

(2)  The terms and conditions of a notice described in Subsection (1), including the required timing of the notice, is governed by the insurance policy.  A certificate of insurance may not alter a term or condition of the notice.



Enacted by Chapter 253, 2011 General Session

